Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4551.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 243.48, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Search of incarcerated person incident to contact with visitor. new text end new text begin The chief executive officer of a state correctional facility may, pursuant to rules adopted by the commissioner, authorize the use of a body scanner or other minimally invasive methods to screen an incarcerated person before or following a meeting with a visitor. A strip search of an incarcerated person before or following a meeting with a visitor is prohibited unless there is a credible, documented security concern to justify a strip search. new text end